ko: 드라이버 구성: 1웨이 (풀레인지); 2웨이; 3웨이; 기타
th: การกำหนดค่าไดรเวอร์: 1 ทาง (เต็มช่วง); 2 ทาง; 3 ทาง; อื่นๆ
it: Configurazione dei driver: 1 via (gamma completa); 2 vie; 3 vie; Altro
nl: Driverconfiguratie: 1-weg (volledig bereik); 2-weg; 3-weg; Andere
en: Driver configuration: 1-way (full-range); 2-way; 3-way; Other
hr-HR: Konfiguracija zvučnika: 1-smjerni (puni raspon); 2-smjerni; 3-smjerni; Ostalo
fr: Configuration du haut-parleur: 1 voie (gamme complète); 2 voies; 3 voies; Autre
hu: Meghajtókonfiguráció: 1 utas (teljes tartományú); 2 utas; 3 utas; Egyéb
nb: Høyttalerkonfigurasjon: 1-veis (fulltoneoppsett); 2-veis; 3-veis; Annet
tr: Sürücü yapılandırması: 1 yollu (tam aralık); 2 yollu; 3 yollu; Diğer
sk-SK: Konfigurácia pohonu: 1-pásmový (plnorozsahový); 2-pásmový; 3-pásmový; Iné
pl: Konfiguracja przetworników: Jednodrożny (pełnozakresowy); Dwudrożny; Trójdrożny; Inne
ja: ドライバー構成: 1ウェイ（フルレンジ）; 2ウェイ; 3ウェイ; その他
es: Configuración de controladores: 1 vía (rango completo); 2 vías; 3 vías; Otros
da: Højttalerkonfiguration: 1-vejs (fuld rækkevidde); 2-vejs; 3-vejs; Andet
fi: Kaiutinelementtien kokoonpano: 1-tie (täysi valikoima); 2-tie; 3-tie; Muu
sv: Elementkonfiguration: 1-vägs (fullregister); 2-vägs; 3-vägs; Övrigt
pt-BR: Configuração do driver: 1 via (faixa completa); 2 vias; 3 vias; Outro
lt-LT: Garsiakalbių konfigūracija: 1 krypties (pilno dažnių diapazono); 2 krypčių; 3 krypčių; Kita
cs: Konfigurace měničů: 1-pásmový (plný rozsah); 2-pásmový; 3-pásmový; Jiné
zh-TW: 驅動器配置: 1 路（全音域）; 2 路; 3 路; 其他
bg-BG: Конфигурация на драйвера: 1-пътен (пълен обхват); 2-пътен; 3-пътен; Други
pt-PT: Configuração do driver: 1 via (gama completa); 2 vias; 3 vias; Outro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija zvočnikov: 1-smerni (polni razpon); 2-smerni; 3-smerni; Drugo
el: Διαμόρφωση οδηγών: 1 κατεύθυνσης (πλήρους εύρους); 2 κατευθύνσεων; 3 κατευθύνσεων; Άλλο
zh-CN: 分频路数: 1 路（全频）; 2 路; 3 路; 其他
ru: Конфигурация динамиков: 1-полосный (полнодиапазонный); 2-полосный; 3-полосный; Другой
de: Treiberkonfiguration: 1-Weg (Vollbereich); 2-Weg; 3-Weg; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Configurația difuzoarelor: 1 cale (gamă completă); 2 căi; 3 căi; Altele
vi: Cấu hình trình điều khiển: 1 đường (toàn dải); 2 đường; 3 đường; Khác